District of Columbia statutes.
28-5102

Art dealer and artist; relationship.

If an art dealer accepts a work of fine art, on a fee, commission, or other compensation basis, on consignment from the artist who created the work of fine art:

(1)

The art dealer shall be, with respect to that work of fine art, the agent of the artist;

(2)

A trust shall be created;

(3)

The work of fine art shall be trust property and the art dealer shall be a trustee for the benefit of the artist until the work of fine art shall be sold to a bona fide third party; and

(4)

The proceeds of the sale of the work of fine art shall be trust property and the art dealer shall be a trustee for the benefit of the artist until the amount due to the artist from the sale is paid.

History

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-310, § 3, 57 DCR 12392

Section References

This section is referenced in § 28-5103 and § 28-5104.